Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.001

Actions subject to review by boundary review board.

The incorporation of a city or town is subject to review by a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW if a boundary review board exists in the county in which all or any portion of the territory proposed to be incorporated is located.

[ 1994 c 216 s 11; 1989 c 84 s 25.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.